vi: Cấu hình cánh quạt máy bay trực thăng: Đồng trục (quay ngược chiều); Cánh quạt đan xen (synchropter); Một cánh quạt chính + đuôi; Cánh quạt trước sau; Tiltrotor; Khác
nb: Konfigurasjon av helikopterrotor: Koaksial (kontraroterende); Kryssende rotorer (synkropter); Enkel hoved- og halerotor; Tandemrotorer; Tiltrotor; Annet
zh-TW: 直升機旋翼配置: 同軸 (反轉); 交叉旋翼 (交叉雙旋翼直升機); 單主旋翼 + 尾旋翼; 縱列雙旋翼; 傾轉旋翼; 其他
sv: Helikopterrotorkonfiguration: Koaxial (motroterande); Överlappande rotorer (synkropter); Enkel huvudrotor + stjärtrotor; Tandemrotorer; Tiltrotor; Övrigt
tr: Helikopter rotor konfigürasyonu: Koaksiyel (zıt dönen); İç içe geçen rotorlar (synchropter); Tek ana + kuyruk rotoru; Tandem rotorlar; Tiltrotor; Diğer
ja: ヘリコプターのローター構成: 同軸 (二重反転); 交差双旋翼 (シンクロプター); シングルメイン+テールローター; タンデムローター; ティルトローター; その他
lt-LT: Sraigtasparnio rotoriaus konfigūracija: Koaksialinis (priešpriešinio sukimosi); Persidengiančių sraigtų („Synchropter“); Vienas pagrindinis + uodegos sraigtas; Tandeminiai sraigtai; Pakreipiamų sraigtų (Tiltrotor); Kita
ko: 헬리콥터 로터 구성: 동축(반전 회전); 교차 로터(싱크롭터); 단일 메인 + 테일 로터; 탠덤 로터; 틸트로터; 기타
hu: Helikopter rotor konfiguráció: Koaxiális (ellentétes forgásirányú); Egymásba nyúló rotorok (synchropter); Egyetlen fő- és farokrotor; Tandem rotorok; Dönthető rotor (tiltrotor); Egyéb
fi: Helikopterin roottorin kokoonpano: Koaksiaalinen (vastakkaisiin suuntiin pyörivä); Lomittaiset roottorit (synkropteri); Yksi pääroottori ja pyrstöroottori; Tandem-roottorit; Kallistusroottori; Muu
sl-SI: Konfiguracija rotorjev helikopterja: Koaksialno (protismerno vrtenje); Prepleteni rotorji (sinhropter); En glavni in repni rotor; Tandemski rotorji; Nagibni rotor; Drugo
en: Helicopter rotor configuration: Coaxial (counter-rotating); Intermeshing rotors (synchropter); Single main + tail rotor; Tandem rotors; Tiltrotor; Other
pt-PT: Configuração do rotor do helicóptero: Coaxial (contrarrotativo); Rotores entrosados (sincróptero); Rotor principal único + rotor de cauda; Rotores em tandem; Tiltrotor; Outro
fr: Configuration des rotors de l’hélicoptère: Coaxial (contrarotatif); Rotors engrenants (synchroptère); Rotor principal unique + rotor de queue; Rotors en tandem; Rotor basculant; Autre
sk-SK: Konfigurácia rotora vrtuľníka: Koaxiálne (protibežné); Prekrývajúce sa rotory (synchropter); Jeden hlavný + chvostový rotor; Tandemové rotory; Preklopný rotor; Iné
de: Rotor-Konfiguration des Hubschraubers: Koaxial (gegenläufig); Ineinandergreifende Rotoren (Flettner-Doppelrotor); Einzel-Haupt- und Heckrotor; Tandemrotoren; Kipprotor; Sonstige
zh-CN: 直升机旋翼配置: 共轴（反转）; 交叉旋翼（交叉双旋翼直升机）; 单主旋翼 + 尾桨; 纵列式旋翼; 倾转旋翼; 其他
it: Configurazione del rotore dell'elicottero: Coassiale (controrotante); Rotori incrociati (sincrottero); Rotore principale singolo e di coda; Rotori in tandem; Convertiplano; Altro
pt-BR: Configuração dos rotores do helicóptero: Coaxial (controrrotativo); Rotores entrelaçados (sincróptero); Rotor principal único + rotor de cauda; Rotores em tandem; Rotor basculante; Outra
bg-BG: Конфигурация на ротора на хеликоптера: Коаксиални (противоположно въртящи се); Взаимопроникващи ротори (синхроптер); Един главен + опашен ротор; Тандемни ротори; Тилтротор; Други
cs: Konfigurace rotoru vrtulníku: Koaxiální (protiběžné); Prolínající se rotory (synchropter); Jeden hlavní + ocasní rotor; Tandemové rotory; Sklopný rotor; Jiná
el: Διαμόρφωση ρότορα ελικοπτέρου: Ομοαξονικοί (αντιπεριστρεφόμενοι); Εμπλεκόμενοι ρότορες (synchropter); Μονός κύριος + ουραίος ρότορας; Διαδοχικοί ρότορες; Κλινόμενου ρότορα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Konfiguracija rotora helikoptera: Koaksijalni (kontrarotirajući); Isprepleteni rotori (sinkropter); Jedan glavni i repni rotor; Tandem rotori; Tiltrotor; Ostalo
ro-RO: Configurația rotorului elicopterului: Coaxial (cu rotație inversă); Rotoare care se intersectează (sincropter); Un singur rotor principal + rotor de coadă; Rotoare în tandem; Tiltrotor; Altele
pl: Konfiguracja wirników śmigłowca: Współosiowy (przeciwbieżny); Wirniki krzyżowe (synchropter); Jeden wirnik nośny + śmigło ogonowe; Wirniki w układzie tandem; Zmiennowirnikowiec (tiltrotor); Inna
ru: Конфигурация роторов вертолета: Соосная (с противоположным вращением); Перекрещивающиеся винты (синхроптер); Один несущий и рулевой винт; Продольная (тандемная); Конвертоплан; Другое
da: Konfiguration af helikopterrotor: Koaksial (kontraroterende); Krydsende rotorer (synkropter); Enkelt hoved- og halerotor; Tandemrotorer; Tiltrotor; Andet
th: การกำหนดค่าใบพัดเฮลิคอปเตอร์: โคแอกเซียล (หมุนทวนกัน); ใบพัดตัดกัน (ซิงครอปเตอร์); ใบพัดหลักเดี่ยว + ใบพัดหาง; ใบพัดหน้าหลัง; ทิลต์โรเตอร์; อื่นๆ
es: Configuración del rotor del helicóptero: Coaxial (contrarrotante); Rotores entrelazados (sincróptero); Rotor principal único + rotor de cola; Rotores en tándem; Rotor basculante; Otra
nl: Helikopter rotor configuratie: Coaxiaal (tegengesteld draaiend); In elkaar grijpende rotoren (synchropter); Enkele hoofd- + staartrotor; Tandemrotoren; Tiltrotor; Overig